Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 15 COLORADO EDUCATIONAL AND CULTURAL FACILITIES AUTHORITY
23-15-125. Enforcement of rights of bondholders.

Any holder of bonds issued pursuant to this article or a trustee under a trust agreement, trust indenture, indenture of mortgage, or deed of trust entered into pursuant to this article, except to the extent that his rights are restricted by any bond resolution, may protect and enforce, by any suitable form of legal proceedings, any rights under the laws of this state or granted by the bond resolution. Such rights include the right to compel the performance of all duties of the authority required by this article or the bond resolution; to enjoin unlawful activities; and, in the event of default with respect to the payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on any bond or in the performance of any covenant or agreement on the part of the authority in the bond resolution, to apply to a court having jurisdiction of the cause to appoint a receiver to administer and operate the facility, the revenues of which are pledged to the payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on such bonds, with full power to pay, and to provide for the payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on such bonds, with such powers, subject to the direction of the court, as are permitted by law and are accorded receivers in general equity cases, but excluding any power to pledge additional revenues of the authority to the payment of such principal, premium, and interest.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1111, § 1, effective July 1.

23-15-126. Bonds eligible for investment.

All banks, bankers, trust companies, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and insurance companies and associations and all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys, or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds issued pursuant to this article. Public entities, as defined in section 24-75-601 (1), C.R.S., may invest public funds in such bonds only if said bonds satisfy the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1112, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1128, § 60, effective July 1.

23-15-127. Account of activities and receipts for expenditures - report - audit.

The authority shall keep an accurate account of all its activities and of all its receipts and expenditures and shall annually, in the month of January, make a report thereof to its members and to the state auditor, such reports to be in a form prescribed by the state auditor. Also included in the report shall be any recommendations with reference to additional legislation or other action that may be necessary to carry out the purpose of the authority. The state auditor may investigate the affairs of the authority, may severally examine the properties and records of the authority, and may prescribe methods of accounting and the rendering of periodical reports in relation to facilities undertaken by the authority.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1112, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 806, § 6, effective May 25.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1239, § 92, effective August 7.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 851, § 10, effective May 24.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996.

23-15-128. Federal social security act.

The authority may take such action as it deems appropriate to enable its employees to come within the provisions and obtain the benefits of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1112, § 1, effective July 1.

23-15-129. Powers of authority not restricted - law complete in itself.

This article shall not be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers which the authority might otherwise have under any laws of this state but shall be construed as cumulative of any such powers. No proceedings, referendum, notice, or approval shall be required for the creation of the authority or the issuance of any bonds or any instrument as security therefor unless so provided in this article; but nothing in this article shall be construed to deprive the state and its political subdivisions of their respective police powers over properties of the authority or to impair any power thereover of any official or agency of the state and its political subdivisions which may be otherwise provided by law.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1112, § 1, effective July 1.

23-15-130. Powers in addition to those granted by other laws.

The powers conferred by this article are in addition and supplementary to, and the limitations imposed by this article do not affect the powers conferred by, any other law, except as provided in this article. Facilities may be acquired, purchased, constructed, reconstructed, improved, bettered, and extended, and bonds may be issued pursuant to this article for said purposes, notwithstanding that any other provision of law may provide for the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, and extensions of like facilities or the issuance of bonds for like purposes; and such bonds may be issued without regard to the requirements, restrictions, limitations, or other provisions contained in any other provision of law.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1112, § 1, effective July 1.

23-15-131. Annual report. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1113, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 806, § 7, effective May 25.